Washington statutes.
RCW 43.130.010

Purpose.

When either for fiscal reasons, obsolescence or other extraordinary reasons, it becomes necessary to close a state facility, as defined by RCW 43.130.020(2), the state has a responsibility to provide certain benefits to affected employees.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish an economic impact act for the state of Washington to meet the emergency situation now in existence for state employees affected by the closure of state facilities, as defined in RCW 43.130.020.

[ 1973 2nd ex.s. c 37 s 1.]